Washington statutes.
RCW 35.99.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Cable television service" means the one-way transmission to subscribers of video programming and other programming service and subscriber interaction, if any, that is required for the selection or use of the video programming or other programming service.

(2) "Facilities" means all of the plant, equipment, fixtures, appurtenances, antennas, and other facilities necessary to furnish and deliver telecommunications services and cable television services, including but not limited to poles with crossarms, poles without crossarms, wires, lines, conduits, cables, communication and signal lines and equipment, braces, guys, anchors, vaults, and all attachments, appurtenances, and appliances necessary or incidental to the distribution and use of telecommunications services and cable television services.

(3) "Master permit" means the agreement in whatever form whereby a city or town may grant general permission to a service provider to enter, use, and occupy the right-of-way for the purpose of locating facilities. This definition is not intended to limit, alter, or change the extent of the existing authority of a city or town to require a franchise nor does it change the status of a service provider asserting an existing statewide grant based on a predecessor telephone or telegraph company's existence at the time of the adoption of the Washington state Constitution to occupy the right-of-way. For the purposes of this subsection, a franchise, except for a cable television franchise, is a master permit. A master permit does not include cable television franchises.

(4) "Personal wireless services" means commercial mobile services, unlicensed wireless services, and common carrier wireless exchange access services, as defined by federal laws and regulations.

(5) "Right-of-way" means land acquired or dedicated for public roads and streets, but does not include:

(a) State highways;

(b) Land dedicated for roads, streets, and highways not opened and not improved for motor vehicle use by the public;

(c) Structures, including poles and conduits, located within the right-of-way;

(d) Federally granted trust lands or forest board trust lands;

(e) Lands owned or managed by the state parks and recreation commission; or

(f) Federally granted railroad rights-of-way acquired under 43 U.S.C. Sec. 912 and related provisions of federal law that are not open for motor vehicle use.

(6) "Service provider" means every corporation, company, association, joint stock association, firm, partnership, person, city, or town owning, operating, or managing any facilities used to provide and providing telecommunications or cable television service for hire, sale, or resale to the general public. Service provider includes the legal successor to any such corporation, company, association, joint stock association, firm, partnership, person, city, or town.

(7) "Telecommunications service" means the transmission of information by wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other similar means for hire, sale, or resale to the general public. For the purpose of this subsection, "information" means knowledge or intelligence represented by any form of writing, signs, signals, pictures, sounds, or any other symbols. For the purpose of this chapter, telecommunications service excludes the over-the-air transmission of broadcast television or broadcast radio signals.

(8) "Use permit" means the authorization in whatever form whereby a city or town may grant permission to a service provider to enter and use the specified right-of-way for the purpose of installing, maintaining, repairing, or removing identified facilities.

[ 2000 c 83 s 1.]